South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4252.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-170(A)(8) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (8) public and private vehicles while transporting individuals actually engaged in emergency activities because one or more occupants belong to a fire department, volunteer fire department, police department, sheriff's office, authorized county government litter enforcement office, rescue squad, emergency management office, or volunteer rescue squad; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----